Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-116 Request for notice; interested
persons. An interested person not otherwise entitled to notice who desires
to be notified before any order is made in a guardianship proceeding, including
a proceeding after the appointment of a guardian, or in a protective
proceeding, may file a request for notice with the clerk of the court in which
the proceeding is pending. The clerk shall send or deliver a copy of the
request to the guardian and to the conservator, if one has been appointed. A
request is not effective unless it contains a statement showing the interest of
the person making it and the address of that person or a lawyer to whom notice
is to be given. The request is effective only as to proceedings conducted
after its filing. A governmental agency paying or planning to pay benefits, or
providing services, to the respondent or protected person is an interested
person in a protective proceeding. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next